Washington statutes.
RCW 4.22.920

Applicability—1981 c 27.

(1) Chapter 27, Laws of 1981 shall apply to all claims arising on or after July 26, 1981.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and 4.22.060 shall also apply to all actions in which trial on the underlying action has not taken place prior to July 26, 1981, except that there is no right of contribution in favor of or against any party who has, prior to July 26, 1981, entered into a release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar agreement with the claimant.

[ 1982 c 100 s 2; 1981 c 27 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 100: See note following RCW 4.22.040.